pt-PT: Cobertura do pretzel: Glacê de doce; Caramelo; Queijo; Chocolate; Açúcar e canela; Chocolate negro; Tempero completo; Alho e ervas; Mostarda e mel; Baixo teor de sódio; Chocolate de leite; Manteiga de amendoim; Simples/nenhuma; Salgado; Pó temperado; Glacê de açúcar; Caramelo; Chocolate branco; Iogurte; Outra
nl: Pretzel coating: Snoepglazuur; Karamel; Kaas; Chocolade; Kaneelsuiker; Pure chocolade; Everything-kruiden; Knoflook & kruiden; Honing-mosterd; Natriumarm; Melkchocolade; Pindakaas; Naturel/geen; Gezouten; Kruidenpoeder; Suikerglazuur; Toffee; Witte chocolade; Yoghurt; Anders
lt-LT: Pretzelių glajus / padengimas: Saldainių glajus; Karamelė; Sūris; Šokoladas; Cinamono cukrus; Juodasis šokoladas; Įvairūs prieskoniai; Česnakai ir žolelės; Medus ir garstyčios; Mažiau natrio; Pieniškas šokoladas; Žemės riešutų sviestas; Paprastas / nėra; Su druska; Prieskonių milteliai; Cukraus glajus; Irisas; Baltasis šokoladas; Jogurtas; Kita
sl-SI: Premaz breskvic/prest: Bonbonska glazura; Karamela; Sir; Čokolada; Cimetov sladkor; Temna čokolada; Mešanica začimb (everything); Česen in zelišča; Med in gorčica; Z malo soli; Mlečna čokolada; Kikirikijevo maslo; Navadno/brez; Soljeno; Začimbe v prahu; Sladkorna glazura; Toffee; Bela čokolada; Jogurt; Drugo
bg-BG: Покритие за гевреци: Захарна глазура; Карамел; Сирене; Шоколад; Захар с канела; Черен шоколад; Микс от подправки (Everything); Чесън и билки; Медена горчица; С ниско съдържание на натрий; Млечен шоколад; Фъстъчено масло; Обикновени/без глазура; Солени; Подправени на прах; Захарна глазура; Тофи; Бял шоколад; Йогурт; Друго
sk-SK: Povlak praclíkov: Cukrová poleva; Karamel; Syr; Čokoláda; Škoricový cukor; Tmavá čokoláda; Zmes korenia Everything; Cesnak a bylinky; Medová horčica; Znížený obsah sodíka; Mliečna čokoláda; Arašidové maslo; Bez príchute/žiadne; Solené; Ochutený prášok; Cukrová glazúra; Karamelky; Biela čokoláda; Jogurt; Iné
ro-RO: Glazură de covrig: Glazură de bomboane; Caramel; Brânză; Ciocolată; Zahăr cu scorțișoară; Ciocolată neagră; Condiment „everything”; Usturoi și ierburi; Muștar cu miere; Sodiu redus; Ciocolată cu lapte; Unt de arahide; Simplu/fără; Sărat; Pudră condimentată; Glazură de zahăr; Toffee; Ciocolată albă; Iaurt; Altele
pt-BR: Pretzel cobertura: Cobertura doce; Caramelo; Queijo; Chocolate; Açúcar com canela; Chocolate amargo; Tempero everything; Alho e ervas; Mostarda e mel; Baixo teor de sódio; Chocolate ao leite; Pasta de amendoim; Simples/nenhuma; Salgado; Pó temperado; Cobertura de açúcar; Caramelo toffee; Chocolate branco; Iogurte; Outra
de: Brezelüberzug: Bonbonglasur; Karamell; Käse; Schokolade; Zimtzucker; Zartbitterschokolade; Everything-Würzmischung; Knoblauch & Kräuter; Honig-Senf; Natriumarm; Vollmilchschokolade; Erdnussbutter; Natur / Keine; Gesalzen; Würzpulver; Zuckerglasur; Toffee; Weiße Schokolade; Joghurt; Sonstige
it: Rivestimento del pretzel: Glassa di caramelle; Caramello; Formaggio; Cioccolato; Zucchero alla cannella; Cioccolato fondente; Condimento Everything; Aglio ed erbe aromatiche; Senape al miele; A basso contenuto di sodio; Cioccolato al latte; Burro di arachidi; Semplice/nessuna; Salato; Polvere aromatizzata; Glassa di zucchero; Mou; Cioccolato bianco; Yogurt; Altro
fi: Suolatikun päällyste: Karkkikuorrutus; Karamelli; Juusto; Suklaa; Kanelisokeri; Tumma suklaa; Everything-mauste; Valkosipuli ja yrtti; Hunajasinappi; Vähäsuolainen; Maitosuklaa; Maapähkinävoi; Tavallinen / ei mitään; Suolattu; Maustejauhe; Sokerikuorrutus; Toffee; Valkosuklaa; Jogurtti; Muu
el: Επικάλυψη πρέτσελ: Γλάσο καραμέλας; Καραμέλα; Τυρί; Σοκολάτα; Ζάχαρη-κανέλα; Μαύρη σοκολάτα; Μείγμα μπαχαρικών; Σκόρδο & βότανα; Μουστάρδα με μέλι; Χαμηλό νάτριο; Σοκολάτα γάλακτος; Φυστικοβούτυρο; Σκέτο/Κανένα; Αλατισμένο; Σκόνη καρυκευμάτων; Γλάσο ζάχαρης; Τόφι; Λευκή σοκολάτα; Γιαούρτι; Άλλο
pl: Polewa precla: Polewa cukierkowa; Karmel; Ser; Czekolada; Cukier cynamonowy; Ciemna czekolada; Mieszanka przypraw everything; Czosnek i zioła; Musztarda miodowa; Niska zawartość sodu; Mleczna czekolada; Masło orzechowe; Zwykłe/brak; Solone; Przyprawa w proszku; Lukier; Toffi; Biała czekolada; Jogurt; Inne
ko: 프레첼 코팅: 캔디 글레이즈; 캐러멜; 치즈; 초콜릿; 시나몬 슈가; 다크 초콜릿; 에브리띵 시즈닝; 마늘 및 허브; 허니 머스터드; 저나트륨; 밀크 초콜릿; 땅콩 버터; 플레인/없음; 가염; 조미 분말; 슈가 글레이즈; 토피; 화이트 초콜릿; 요거트; 기타
vi: Lớp phủ bánh quy xoắn: Phủ kẹo; Caramel; Phô mai; Sô-cô-la; Đường quế; Sô-cô-la đen; Hỗn hợp gia vị (Everything); Tỏi & thảo mộc; Mù tạt mật ong; Ít natri; Sô-cô-la sữa; Bơ đậu phộng; Không tẩm vị; Muối; Bột gia vị; Phủ đường; Kẹo toffee; Sô-cô-la trắng; Sữa chua; Khác
en: Pretzel coating: Candy glaze; Caramel; Cheese; Chocolate; Cinnamon sugar; Dark chocolate; Everything seasoning; Garlic & herb; Honey mustard; Low sodium; Milk chocolate; Peanut butter; Plain/none; Salted; Seasoned powder; Sugar glaze; Toffee; White chocolate; Yogurt; Other
fr: Enrobage du bretzel: Glaçage sucré; Caramel; Fromage; Chocolat; Sucre à la cannelle; Chocolat noir; Assaisonnement tout garni; Ail et fines herbes; Moutarde au miel; Faible en sodium; Chocolat au lait; Beurre de cacahuète; Nature/aucun; Salé; Poudre assaisonnée; Glaçage au sucre; Caramel au beurre; Chocolat blanc; Yaourt; Autre
es: Recubrimiento de pretzel: Glaseado dulce; Caramelo; Queso; Chocolate; Azúcar con canela; Chocolate oscuro; Sazonador Everything; Ajo y finas hierbas; Mostaza y miel; Bajo en sodio; Chocolate con leche; Mantequilla de maní; Sencillo/ninguno; Con sal; Polvo sazonador; Glaseado de azúcar; Toffee; Chocolate blanco; Yogur; Otro
da: Kringlebelægning: Slikglasur; Karamel; Ost; Chokolade; Kanelsukker; Mørk chokolade; Blandet krydderi; Hvidløg og urter; Honning og sennep; Fattig på natrium; Mælkechokolade; Peanutbutter; Almindelig/ingen; Saltet; Krydderipulver; Sukkerglasur; Toffee; Hvid chokolade; Yoghurt; Anden
zh-TW: 椒鹽脆餅塗層: 糖果糖霜; 焦糖; 起司; 巧克力; 肉桂糖; 黑巧克力; 綜合調味粉; 蒜香香草; 蜂蜜芥末; 低鈉; 牛奶巧克力; 花生醬; 原味/無; 鹽味; 調味粉; 糖霜; 太妃糖; 白巧克力; 優格; 其他
hr-HR: Premaz od pereca: Slatka glazura; Karamela; Sir; Čokolada; Cimet i šećer; Tamna čokolada; Mješavina začina Everything; Češnjak i začinsko bilje; Med i senf; Nizak udio natrija; Mliječna čokolada; Maslac od kikirikija; Obično/bez preljeva; Slano; Začinski prah; Šećerna glazura; Toffee; Bijela čokolada; Jogurt; Ostalo
hu: Perecbevonat: Cukorkamáz; Karamell; Sajt; Csokoládé; Fahéjas cukor; Étcsokoládé; Mindenes fűszerkeverék; Fokhagymás-zöldfűszeres; Mézes-mustáros; Alacsony nátriumtartalmú; Tejcsokoládé; Mogyoróvaj; Sima / nincs; Sózott; Fűszerpor; Cukormáz; Tejkaramella; Fehércsokoládé; Joghurt; Egyéb
tr: Simit kaplaması: Şekerli sır; Karamel; Peynir; Çikolata; Tarçınlı şeker; Bitter çikolata; Karışık baharat; Sarımsak ve ot; Ballı hardal; Düşük sodyumlu; Sütlü çikolata; Fıstık ezmesi; Sade/yok; Tuzlu; Çeşnili toz; Şekerli sır; Toffee; Beyaz çikolata; Yoğurt; Diğer
ru: Покрытие кренделя: Сладкая глазурь; Карамель; Сыр; Шоколад; Сахар с корицей; Темный шоколад; Универсальная приправа; Чеснок и травы; Медовая горчица; С низким содержанием натрия; Молочный шоколад; Арахисовая паста; Без покрытия; С солью; Порошковая приправа; Сахарная глазурь; Тоффи; Белый шоколад; Йогурт; Другое
zh-CN: 椒盐脆饼涂层: 糖浆涂层; 焦糖; 奶酪; 巧克力; 肉桂糖; 黑巧克力; 万能调料; 大蒜与香草; 蜂蜜芥末; 低钠; 牛奶巧克力; 花生酱; 原味/无; 咸味; 调味粉; 糖衣; 太妃糖; 白巧克力; 酸奶; 其他
cs: Poleva preclíků: Kandovaná poleva; Karamel; Sýr; Čokoláda; Skořicový cukr; Hořká čokoláda; Směs koření; Česnek a bylinky; Medová hořčice; Nízký obsah sodíku; Mléčná čokoláda; Arašídové máslo; Obyčejné / bez polevy; Solené; Kořenicí prášek; Cukrová glazura; Karamelka; Bílá čokoláda; Jogurt; Ostatní
sv: Pretzelbeläggning: Karamellglasyr; Kola; Ost; Choklad; Kanelsocker; Mörk choklad; Everything-krydda; Vitlök och örter; Honungssenap; Låg salthalt; Mjölkchoklad; Jordnötssmör; Naturell/ingen; Saltad; Kryddpulver; Sockerglasyr; Toffee; Vit choklad; Yoghurt; Övrigt
th: เคลือบเพรทเซล: เคลือบแคนดี้; คาราเมล; ชีส; ช็อกโกแลต; น้ำตาลอบเชย; ดาร์กช็อกโกแลต; ผงปรุงรสรวม; กระเทียมและสมุนไพร; ฮันนี่มัสตาร์ด; โซเดียมต่ำ; มิลค์ช็อกโกแลต; เนยถั่ว; รสออริจินัล/ไม่เคลือบ; โรยเกลือ; ผงปรุงรส; เคลือบน้ำตาล; ทอฟฟี่; ไวท์ช็อกโกแลต; โยเกิร์ต; อื่นๆ
ja: プレッツェルコーティング: キャンディグレイズ; キャラメル; チーズ; チョコレート; シナモンシュガー; ダークチョコレート; エブリシングシーズニング; ガーリック＆ハーブ; ハニーマスタード; 低ナトリウム; ミルクチョコレート; ピーナッツバター; プレーン/なし; 塩味; シーズニングパウダー; シュガーグレイズ; トフィー; ホワイトチョコレート; ヨーグルト; その他
nb: Saltkringlebelegg: Godteriglasur; Karamell; Ost; Sjokolade; Kanelsukker; Mørk sjokolade; Everything-krydder; Hvitløk og urter; Honning og sennep; Lavt saltinnhold; Melkesjokolade; Peanøttsmør; Naturell / ingen; Saltet; Krydderpulver; Sukkerglasur; Karamell (toffee); Hvit sjokolade; Yoghurt; Annet